Washington statutes.
RCW 15.48.290

Payments required to be made by bailor to bailee subject to security interests and agricultural liens.

All payments of money required by the terms of a seed bailment contract to be made by a bailor to a bailee shall be subject to security interests perfected as required by *chapter 62A.9 RCW, as amended, and all agricultural liens provided for and perfected in accordance with Title 60 RCW.

[ 1967 c 114 s 16.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: Chapter 62A.9 RCW was repealed in its entirety by 2000 c 250 s 9A-901, effective July 1, 2001. For later enactment, see chapter 62A.9A RCW.

Emergency—Effective date—1967 c 114: See note following RCW 62A.4-406.